North Carolina statutes. Chapter 95. Department of Labor and Labor Regulations.
Article 14B. Amusement Device Safety Act of North Carolina.

§ 95-111.1.
Short title and legislative purpose.

This Article shall be known as the “Amusement Device Safety Act of North Carolina”.

The General Assembly finds that although most amusement devices are free from defect and operated in a safe manner, those which are not impose a substantial probability of serious and preventable injury to the public. Protection of the public from exposure to such unsafe conditions and the prevention of injuries is in the best interest and welfare of the people of the State.

It is the intent of this Article that amusement devices shall be designed, constructed, assembled or disassembled, maintained, and operated so as to prevent injuries.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2.

§ 95-111.2.
Scope.

This Article shall govern the design, construction, installation, plans review, testing, inspection, certification, operation, use, maintenance, alteration, relocation and investigation of accidents involving amusement devices.

This Article shall not apply to any device which does not normally require the supervision or services of an operator.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2; 1991, c. 178, s. 1; 2003-170, s. 1.

§ 95-111.3.
Definitions.

The term “amusement device” shall mean any mechanical or structural device or attraction that carries or conveys or permits persons to walk along, around or over a fixed or restricted route or course or within a defined area including the entrances and exits thereto, for the purpose of giving such persons amusement, pleasure, thrills or excitement. This term shall not include any of the following:

Devices operated on a river, lake, or any other natural body of water.

Wavepools.

Roller skating rinks.

Ice skating rinks.

Skateboard ramps or courses.

Mechanical bulls.

Buildings or concourses used in laser games.

All-terrain vehicles.

Motorcycles.

Bicycles.

Mopeds.

Rock walls that are in a fixed, permanent location.

Zip-lines.

Funhouses, haunted houses, and similar walk-through devices that are erected temporarily on a seasonal basis and do not have mechanical components.

Playground equipment, including but not limited to soft contained play equipment, swings, seesaws, slides, stationary spring-mounted animal features, jungle gyms, rider-propelled merry-go-rounds, and trampolines.

Any train or device previously or currently approved for use on the public rail transit system.

The term “amusement park” shall mean any tract or area used principally as a permanent location for amusement devices.

(b1)

The term “annual gross volume” shall mean the gross receipts a person or device receives from all types of sales made and business done during a 12-month period.

(b2)

The term “carnival area” shall mean any area, track, or structure that is rented, leased, or owned as a temporary location for amusement devices.

The term “Commissioner” shall mean the North Carolina Commissioner of Labor or his authorized representative.

The term “Director” shall mean the Director of the Elevator and Amusement Device Division of the North Carolina Department of Labor.

The term “operator” shall mean any person having direct control of the operation of an amusement device. The term “operator” shall not include any person on the device for the purpose of receiving amusement, pleasure, thrills, or excitement.

The term “owner” shall mean any person or authorized agent of such person who owns an amusement device or in the event such device is leased, the lessee. The term “owner” also shall include the State of North Carolina or any political subdivision thereof or any unit of local government.

The term “person” shall mean any individual, association, partnership, firm, corporation, private organization, or the State of North Carolina or any political subdivision thereof or any unit of local government.

The term “waterslide” shall mean a stationary amusement device that provides a descending ride on a flowing water film through a trough or tube or on an inclined plane into a pool of water. This term does not include devices where the vertical distance between the highest and the lowest points does not exceed 15 feet.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2; 1987, c. 864, s. 90(a); 1991, c. 178, s. 2; 2011-366, s. 5; 2015-152, s. 1; 2021-82, s. 2.

§ 95-111.4.
Powers and duties of Commissioner.

The Commissioner of Labor is hereby empowered to do all of the following:

To delegate to the Director of the Elevator and Amusement Device Division such powers, duties and responsibilities as the Commissioner determines will best serve the public interest in the safe operation of amusement devices.

To supervise the Director of the Elevator and Amusement Device Division.

To adopt, modify, or revoke such rules and regulations as are necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Article including, but not limited to, those governing the design, construction, installation, plans review, testing, inspection, certification, operation, use, maintenance, alteration and relocation of devices subject to the provisions of this Article. The rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this rulemaking authority shall conform with good engineering and safety standards, formulas and practices.

To enforce rules and regulations adopted under authority of this Article.

To inspect and have tested for acceptance all new and relocated devices subject to the provisions of this Article. Relocated amusement devices shall be inspected upon reassembly at each new location within this State; provided that the Commissioner may provide for less frequent inspections when he determines that the device is of such a type and its use is of such a nature that inspection less often than upon each reassembly would not expose the public to an unsafe condition likely to result in serious personal injury or property damage.

To inspect amusement devices which have been substantially rebuilt or substantially modified so as to change the original action, structure or capacity of the device.

To make maintenance and periodic inspections and tests of all devices subject to the provisions of this Article. Devices located in amusement parks shall be inspected at least once annually.

To issue certificates of operation which certify for use such devices as are found to be in compliance with this Article and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

To have reasonable access, with or without notice, to the devices subject to the provisions of this Article during reasonable hours, for purposes of inspection or testing.

To obtain an Administrative Search and Inspection Warrant in accordance with the provisions of Article 4A of Chapter 15 of the General Statutes.

To investigate accidents involving devices subject to the provisions of this Article to determine the cause of the accident, and the Commissioner shall have full subpoena powers in conducting the investigation.

To institute proceedings in the civil courts of this State, when a provision of this Article or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder has been violated.

To adopt, modify or revoke rules and regulations governing the qualifications of inspectors.

To grant exceptions from the requirements of the rules and regulations promulgated under authority of this Article and to permit the use of other devices when these exceptions and uses will not expose the public to an unsafe condition likely to result in serious personal injury or property damage.

To require that before any device subject to the provisions of this Article is erected in this State, or before any additions or alterations which substantially change the device are made, or before the physical spacing between the devices is changed, the owner or the owner’s authorized agent shall file with the Commissioner a written notice of the owner’s intention to do so and the type of device involved. Should circumstances necessitate, the Commissioner may require that the owner or the owner’s authorized agent furnish a copy of the plans, diagrams, specifications or stress analyses of the device before the inspection of the device. When plans, diagrams, specifications or stress analyses are requested by the Commissioner, the Commissioner shall review them within 10 days of receipt, and upon approval, shall authorize the device for use by the public.

To prohibit the use of any device subject to the provisions of this Article which is found upon inspection to expose the public to an unsafe condition likely to cause personal injury or property damage. Such a device shall be made operational only upon the Commissioner’s determination that it has been made safe.

To order the payment of all civil penalties provided by this Article. The clear proceeds of funds collected pursuant to a civil penalty order shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

To coordinate enforcement and inspection activity relative to equipment, devices and operations covered by this Article in order to minimize duplication of liability or regulatory responsibility on the part of the employer or owner.

To establish fees not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for the inspection and issuance of certificates of operation for devices subject to this Article that are in use.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2; 1987, c. 635, s. 2; 1998-215, s. 110; 2001-427, s. 11(f); 2014-115, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 5, effective August 11, 2014, added “to do all of the following” in the introductory paragraph; and made stylistic and punctuation changes throughout the section.

§ 95-111.5.
Pre-opening inspection and test; records; revocation of certificate of operation.

An owner of a device subject to the provisions of this Article, or his authorized agent, is hereby required to make a pre-opening inspection and test of such device, prior to admitting the public, each day such device is intended to be used.

An owner of a device subject to the provisions of this Article, or his authorized agent, is hereby required to maintain for at least the previous 12 months a signed record of the required pre-opening inspection and test and such other pertinent information as the Commissioner may require by rule or regulation.

The Commissioner is hereby empowered to revoke the certificate of operation for any device regulated by this Article upon failure by the owner or his authorized agent to make the required pre-opening inspection and test or to maintain the required record.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2; 2003-170, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2003-170, s. 2, effective June 12, 2004, substituted “the previous 12 months” for “30 days” in subsection (b).

§ 95-111.6.
Noncomplying devices; appeal.

Whenever the Commissioner determines that a device is subject to the provisions of this Article and the operation of such device is exposing the public to an unsafe condition likely to result in serious personal injury or property damage, he immediately may order in writing that the use of the device be stopped or limited until such time as he determines that the device has been made safe for use by the public.

Whenever the Commissioner determines that the provisions of this Article or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder have not been complied with, he may refuse to issue or renew or may revoke, suspend or amend a certificate of operation.

Any action taken under this section by the Commissioner shall be final, unless within 15 days after receipt of notice thereof by certified mail with return receipt, by signature confirmation as provided by the U.S. Postal Service, by a designated delivery service authorized pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 7502(f)(2) with delivery receipt, or via hand delivery, the person against whom such action was taken takes exception to the determination, in which event the final determination of the action shall be made in an administrative proceeding and in a judicial proceeding pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2; 2015-221, s. 1.6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-221, s. 1.6, effective August 18, 2015, rewrote subsection (c).

§ 95-111.7.
Operation without certificate; operation not in accordance with Article or rules and regulations; operation after refusal to issue or after revocation of certificate.

No person shall operate or permit to be operated or use any device subject to the provisions of this Article without a valid certificate of operation.

No person shall operate or permit to be operated or use any device subject to the provisions of this Article otherwise than in accordance with this Article and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

No person shall operate or permit to be operated or use any device subject to the provisions of this Article after the Commissioner has refused to issue or has revoked the certificate of operation for such device.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2.

§ 95-111.8.
Location notice.

No person shall operate for the public or permit the operation for the public any device subject to the provisions of this Article after initial assembly or after reassembly at any location within this State without first notifying the Commissioner of the intention to operate for the public. Written notice of a planned schedule of operation or use shall be received at least 10 working days prior to the first planned date of operation or use.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2; 2003-170, s. 3; 2011-366, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-366, s. 6, effective June 27, 2011, inserted “working” in the last sentence.

§ 95-111.9.
Operation of unsafe device.

No person shall operate, permit to be operated or use any device subject to the provisions of this Article if such person knows or reasonably should know that such operation or use will expose the public to an unsafe condition which is likely to result in personal injury or property damage.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2.

§ 95-111.10.
Reports required.

The owner of any device regulated under the provisions of this Article, or his authorized agent, shall within 24 hours, notify the Commissioner of each and every occurrence involving such device when:

The occurrence results in death or injury requiring medical treatment, other than first aid, by a physician. First aid means the one time treatment or observation of scratches, cuts not requiring stitches, burns, splinters and contusions or a diagnostic procedure, including examination and x-rays, which does not ordinarily require medical treatment even though provided by a physician or other licensed personnel; or

The occurrence results in damage to the device indicating a substantial defect in design, mechanics, structure or equipment, affecting the future safe operation of the device. No reporting is required in the case of normal wear and tear.

The Commissioner, without delay, after notification and determination that an occurrence involving injury or damage as specified in subsection (a) has occurred, shall make a complete and thorough investigation of the occurrence. The report of the investigation shall be placed on file in the office of the division and shall give in detail all facts and information available. The owner may submit for inclusion in the file results of investigations independent of the department’s investigation.

No person, following an occurrence as specified in subsection (a), shall operate, attempt to operate, use or move or attempt to move such device or part thereof, without the approval of the Commissioner, unless so as to prevent injury to any person or persons.

No person, following an occurrence as specified in subsection (a), shall remove or attempt to remove from the premises any damaged or undamaged part of such device or repair or attempt to repair any damaged part necessary to a complete and thorough investigation. The department must initiate its investigation within 24 hours of being notified.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2.

§ 95-111.11.
Operators.

Any operator of a device subject to the provisions of this Article shall be at least 18 years of age. An operator shall operate no more than one device at any given time. An operator shall be in attendance at all times the device is in operation.

No person shall operate any amusement device equipment while under the influence of alcohol or any other impairing substance as defined by G.S. 20-4.01(14a). It shall be a violation of this subsection to knowingly permit the operation of any amusement device while the operator is under the influence of an impairing substance.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2; 2003-170, s. 4.

§ 95-111.12.
Liability insurance.

No owner shall operate a device subject to the provisions of this Article, unless at the time, there is in existence a contract of insurance providing coverage of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence against liability for injury to persons or property arising out of the operation or use of such device or there is in existence a contract of insurance providing coverage of not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per occurrence against liability for injury to persons or property arising out of the operation or use of the amusement device if the annual gross volume of the device does not exceed two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000); provided waterslides shall not be required to be insured as herein provided for an amount in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per occurrence. The insurance contract to be provided must be by any insurer or surety that is acceptable to the North Carolina Insurance Commissioner and authorized to transact business in this State; provided, however, that insurance for waterslides may be purchased under Article 21 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes or under G.S. 58-28-5(b).

No certificate of operation shall be issued by the Commissioner until such time as the owner or his authorized agent provides proof of the required contract of insurance.

The Commissioner shall have the right to request from the owner of a device regulated by this Article, or his authorized agent, proof of the required contract of insurance, and upon failure of the owner or his authorized agent to provide such proof, the Commissioner shall have the right to prevent the commencement of or to stop the operation of the device until such time as proof is provided.

Operators of waterslides, as defined in G.S. 95-111.3(h), shall notify the Commissioner of all incidences of personal injury involving the waterslides, as required by

G.S. 95-111.10(a)

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2; 1987, c. 635, s. 1; c. 864, ss. 90(b), 91(a); 1989, c. 232; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 914; 1995, c. 517, s. 34; 2015-152, s. 3.

§ 95-111.13.
Violations; civil penalties; appeal; criminal penalties.

Any person who violates

G.S. 95-111.7(a)

or (b) (Operation without certificate; operation not in accordance with Article or rules and regulations) or

G.S. 95-111.8

(Location notice) is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250) for each rule, regulation, or section of this Article violated and for each day each device is so operated or used.

Any person who violates

G.S. 95-111.7(c)

(Operation after refusal to issue or after revocation of certificate) or

G.S. 95-111.10(c)

(Reports required) or

G.S. 95-111.12

(Liability insurance) is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each day each device is so operated or used.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-152, s. 2, effective July 16, 2015, and applicable to violations occurring on or after that date.

Any person who violates the provisions of

G.S. 95-111.10(d)

(Reports required) or knowingly permits the operation of an amusement device in violation of G.S. 95-111.11(a) (Operator requirements) is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each day each device is so operated or used.

Any person who violates

G.S. 95-111.9

(Operation of unsafe device) or G.S. 95-111.11(b) (Operation of an amusement device while impaired) is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day each device is so operated or used.

In determining the amount of any penalty ordered under authority of this section, the Commissioner shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the annual gross volume of the person being charged, the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the person, and the record of previous violations.

The determination of the amount of the penalty by the Commissioner is final, unless within 15 days after receipt of notice thereof by certified mail with return receipt, by signature confirmation as provided by the U.S. Postal Service, by a designated delivery service authorized pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 7502(f)(2) with delivery receipt, or via hand delivery, the person charged with the violation takes exception to the determination, in which event final determination of the penalty shall be made in an administrative proceeding and in a judicial proceeding pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act.

The Commissioner may file in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county wherein the person, against whom a civil penalty has been ordered, resides, or if a corporation is involved, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or in the county wherein the violation occurred, a certified copy of a final order of the Commissioner unappealed from, or of a final order of the Commissioner affirmed upon appeal. Whereupon, the clerk of said court shall enter judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though said judgment had been rendered in a suit duly heard and determined by the superior court of the General Court of Justice.

Except as provided under subsection (j) of this section, any person who willfully violates any provision of this Article is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, which may include a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000); except that if the conviction is for a violation committed after a first conviction of the person, the person shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, which may include a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this Article, and that violation causes the serious injury or death of any person, then the person is guilty of a Class E felony, which shall include a fine.

Nothing in this section prevents any prosecuting officer of the State of North Carolina from proceeding against a person who violates this Article on a prosecution charging any degree of willful or culpable homicide.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2; 2003-170, s. 5; 2003-308, s. 4; 2007-231, s. 8; 2015-152, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-231, s. 8, effective July 18, 2007, in subsection (g), substituted “with return receipt, by signature confirmation as provided by the U.S. Postal Service” for “or” and inserted “or via hand delivery.”

Session Laws 2015-152, s. 2, rewrote subsection (a); substituted “two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00)” in subsection (b); deleted former subsection (c), which read: “Any person who violates

G.S. 95-111.8

(Location notice) shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each day any device is operated or used without the location notice having been provided”; substituted “two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each day each device is so operated or used” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00)” in subsection (d); substituted “five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day each device is so operated or used” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” in subsection (e); substituted “ annual gross volume” for “size of the business” in subsection (f); in subsection (i), added “Except as provided under subsection (j) of this section” and substituted “Article is guilty” for “Article, and the violation causes the death of any person, shall be guilty” in the first sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “This subsection shall not prevent any prosecuting officer of the State of North Carolina from proceeding against such person on a prosecution charging any degree of willful or culpable homicide”; added subsection (j) and (k); and made minor stylistic changes. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 95-111.14.
Denial of permission to enter amusement device.

The owner or amusement device operator may deny any person entrance to an amusement device if he or she believes such entry may jeopardize the safety of the person desiring entry, riders or other persons.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2.

§ 95-111.15.
Legal representation.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General of North Carolina, when requested, to represent the Department of Labor in actions or proceedings in connection with this Article or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2.

§ 95-111.16.
Authorization for similar safety and health federal-State programs.

Consistent with the requirements and conditions provided in this Article and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, the State, upon recommendation of the Commissioner of Labor, may enter into agreements or arrangements with appropriate federal agencies for the purpose of administering the enforcement of federal statutes and rules and regulations governing devices subject to the provisions of this Article.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2.

§ 95-111.17.
Confidentiality of trade secrets.

All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the Commissioner or his agents or representatives in connection with any inspection or proceeding under this Article or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder which contains or might reveal a trade secret shall be considered confidential, except as to carrying out this Article and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder or when it is relevant in any proceeding under the same. In any such proceeding the Commissioner or the Court shall issue such orders as may be appropriate to protect the confidentiality of trade secrets.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2.

§ 95-111.18.
Construction of Article and rules and regulations and severability.

This Article and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder shall receive a liberal construction to the end that the welfare of the people may be protected. If any provisions of either or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid, such invalidity shall not affect those provisions or applications which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this Article are severable.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 990, s. 2.

§§ 95-112 through 95-115.

Reserved for future codification purposes.